West Virginia, session 2025, HB2207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. CORRECTIONS MANAGEMENT §15A-4-17. Deduction from sentence for good conduct; mandatory supervision. (a) All adult inmates placed in the custody of the Commissioner of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to a term of court-ordered incarceration for a misdemeanor or eligible felony, except those committed pursuant to §25-4-1 et seq. and §62-12-26 of this code, shall be granted commutation from their sentences for good conduct in accordance with this section: Provided, That nothing in this section shall may be considered to recalculate the "good time" of inmates currently serving a sentence or of giving back good time to inmates who have previously lost good time earned for a disciplinary violation: Provided, however, That as of the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted during the regular session of the Legislature, 2021, an inmate who had good time calculated into his or her release date prior to October 21, 2020, is entitled to the benefit of the good time awarded or earned before that date, unless the good time was lost due to a disciplinary violation.(b) An inmate sentenced to serve a life sentence is not eligible to earn or receive any good time pursuant to this section.(c) A conviction pursuant to the following felony offenses is hereby excluded from any and all deductions from a sentence for good conduct and are treated and defined as ineligible felony convictions, all other felony offenses are to be considered as an eligible felony for purposes of any deductions from sentence for good conduct:(1) §61-2-1, §61-2-12(a), §61-2-14a, §61-2-29a (c), and §61-2-29a (d), all relating to crimes against the person;(2) §61-8B-3, §61-8B-4, §61-8B-5, §61-8B-7, §61-8B-8, and §61-8B-9, all relating to sexual offenses;(3) §61-8D-2, §61-8D-2a, §61-8D-4a, §61-8D-5, and §61-8D-6, all relating to child abuse; and(4) §61-14-2 relating to human trafficking.(b) (d) The commutation of sentence, known as "good time", shall be deducted from the maximum term of indeterminate sentences or from the fixed term of determinate sentences.(c) (e) Each eligible inmate sentenced to incarceration for a misdemeanor or eligible felony and committed to the custody of the commissioner and incarcerated in a facility pursuant to that commitment shall be granted one day good time for each day he or she is incarcerated, including any and all days in jail awaiting sentence which are credited by the sentencing court to his or her sentence pursuant to §61-11-24 of this code, or for any other reason relating to the commitment. An inmate may not be granted any good time for time served either on parole or bond or in any other status when he or she is not physically incarcerated.(d) An inmate sentenced to serve a life sentence is not eligible to earn or receive any good time pursuant to this section(e) (f) An eligible inmate under two or more consecutive sentences shall be allowed good time as if the several sentences, when the maximum terms of the consecutive sentences are added together, were all one sentence.(f) (g) The commissioner shall promulgate disciplinary rules and policies. The rules and policies shall describe acts that inmates are prohibited from committing, procedures for charging individual inmates for violation of the rules, and for determining the guilt or innocence of inmates charged with the violations, and the sanctions which may be imposed for the violations. A copy of the rules shall be given to each inmate. For each violation any part or all of the good time which has been granted to the inmate pursuant to this section may be forfeited and revoked by the superintendent of the institution in which the violation occurred. The superintendent, when appropriate and with approval of the commissioner, may restore any forfeited good time.(g) (h) Each inmate, upon his or her commitment to, and being placed into the custody of, the commissioner, or upon his or her return to custody as the result of violation of parole under §62-12-19 of this code, or supervised release under §62-12-26 of this code shall be given a statement setting forth the term or length of his or her sentence or sentences and the time of his or her minimum discharge computed according to this section.(h) (i) Each inmate shall be given a revision of the statement described in subsection (g) of this section when any part or all of the good time has been forfeited and revoked or restored pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, by which the time of his or her earliest discharge is changed.(i) (j) (1) An eligible inmate may receive extra good time in the sole discretion of the commissioner for meritorious service or performing extra assigned duties during emergencies; and(2) In addition to the good time granted under subsection (c) of this section and that authorized by subdivision (1) of this subsection, an eligible inmate serving a felony sentence may receive up to 90 days good time per program for successfully completing an approved, but not required, academic or vocational program, which is not part of the inmate’s required individualized reentry programing plan. The commissioner shall adopt a written policy to effectuate the purposes of this subsection.(j) (k) There shall may be no grants or accumulations of good time or credit to any inmate serving a sentence in the custody of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation except in the manner provided in this section.(k) (l) Prior to the calculated discharge date of an inmate serving a sentence for a an eligible felony crime of violence against the person, a felony offense where the victim was a minor child, or a felony offense involving the use of a firearm, one year shall be deducted from the inmate’s accumulated good time to provide for one year of mandatory post-release supervision following the first instance in which the inmate reaches his or her calculated discharge date. All inmates released pursuant to this subsection are subject to electronic or GPS monitoring for the entire period of supervision. The provisions of this subsection are applicable to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.(m) An inmate serving a sentence for an ineligible felony crime, as defined in this section, shall be required to have one year of mandatory post-release supervision following the first instance in which the inmate reaches his or her calculated discharge date.  All inmates released pursuant to this subsection are subject to electronic or GPS monitoring for the entire period of supervision.(l) (n) Upon sentencing of an inmate for a felony offense not referenced in subsection (k) of this section, the court may order that 180 days of the sentence, or some lesser period, be served through post-release mandatory supervision if the court determines supervision is appropriate and in the best interest of justice, rehabilitation, and public safety. All inmates released pursuant to this subsection are subject to electronic or GPS monitoring for the entire period of supervision. The provisions of this subsection are applicable to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.(m) (o) The commissioner shall adopt policies and procedures to implement the mandatory supervision provided for in subsections (k) and (l) of this section which may include terms, conditions, and procedures for supervision, modification, and violation applicable to persons on parole.(n) (p) As used in this section, "felony crime of violence against the person" means felony offenses set forth in §61-2-1 et seq., §61-3E-1 et seq., §61-8B-1 et seq., or §61-8D-1 et seq of this code, and the felony offenses of arson and burglary of a residence where an individual is physically located at the time of the offense as set forth in §61-3-1 et seq. of this code.(o) (q) As used in this section, "felony offense where the victim was a minor child" means any felony crime of violence against the person and any felony offense set forth in §61-8-1 et seq., §61-8A-1 et seq., §61-8C-1 et seq., or §61-8D-1 et seq of this code.(p) (r) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, its commissioner, employees, agents, and assigns, shall be granted absolute immunity from liability from any claims or actions of any person serving, or who has served, a term of incarceration pursuant to §62-12-26 of this code, for any matter or claim arising out of good time calculations or awards which may or may not have been awarded, given, removed, or taken which caused a person to be reincarcerated or to increase the expected term of his or her incarceration, which calculation, award, removal, taking, or reincarceration occurred prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted during the regular session of the Legislature, 2021 2025.